Massachusetts, session 194th, H1962.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 94C of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after section 34A, the
following section:-
Section 34B. (a) A police officer who, in good faith, seeks medical assistance for
someone experiencing an anaphylactic reaction shall not be charged or prosecuted for possession
of a controlled substance under sections 34 or 35 if the evidence for the charge of possession of a
controlled substance was gained as a result of the seeking of medical assistance.
(b) A person who experiences an anaphylactic reaction and is in need of medical
assistance and, in good faith, seeks such medical assistance, or is the subject of such a good faith
request for medical assistance, shall not be charged or prosecuted for possession of a controlled
substance under said sections 34 or 35 if the evidence for the charge of possession of a controlled
substance was gained as a result of the anaphylactic reaction and the need for medical assistance.
of 2

(c) The act of seeking medical assistance for someone who is experiencing an
anaphylactic reaction may be used as a mitigating factor in a criminal prosecution under the
Controlled Substance Act,1970 P.L. 91–513, 21 U.S.C. section 801, et seq.
(d) Nothing contained in this section shall prevent anyone from being charged with
trafficking, distribution or possession of a controlled substance with intent to distribute.
(e) A police officer acting in good faith may receive an epinephrine autoinjector, possess
an epinephrine autoinjector and administer an epinephrine autoinjector to an individual
appearing to experience an anaphylactic reaction, and provided further that no police office shall
be liable in a civil suit for damages as a result of any acts or omissions in providing or obtaining,
or attempting to provide or obtain, such assistance unless such acts or omissions constitute
willful, wanton or reckless conduct.
of 2